Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.10.100

Effect of final orders against officers, directors, employees, and agents.

A present or former director, officer, manager, employee, or agent of a state trust institution or affiliate, or any other person against whom there is outstanding an effective final order under authority of this chapter which has been duly served is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable under chapter 9A.20 RCW, if such person thereafter:

(1) Participates in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of a state trust institution or affiliate;

(2) Directly or indirectly solicits or procures, transfers or attempts to transfer, or votes or attempts to vote any proxies, consents, or authorizations with respect to any voting rights in the state trust institution or affiliate;

(3) Without the prior approval of the department, votes for a director;

(4) Serves or acts as a director, officer, manager, employee, or agent of any depository institution, trust company, or affiliate of a depository institution or trust company doing business in Washington state.

[ 2019 c 389 s 30; 2014 c 37 s 343.]